District of Columbia statutes.
44-1713

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any persons or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

History

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 282, Pub. L. 85-87, § 15

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-713.
1973 Ed., § 2-2113.